Utah statutes.
53A-17a-137.   Classified employees' compensation.
(1)  In view of the fact that instructional salary money is supported by both
the value of the weighted pupil unit and by a line item appropriation for
reform measures, other educational personnel, including classified employees,
shall be given added consideration in the division of the weighted pupil unit.
(2)  Local school boards shall provide higher compensation adjustments to
classified employee groups in comparison to other district employee groups
when dividing the weighted pupil unit for compensation adjustment purposes.
